New York, session 2025-2026, A4839.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 13.07 of the mental hygiene law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision (f) to read as follows: 3 (f) (1) In the event of a state declaration of disaster emergency 4 pursuant to section twenty-eight of the executive law which relates to 5 public health, the office shall: 6 (i) purchase and provide personal protective equipment (PPE) to all 7 direct support professionals, care recipients and group home providers 8 in the state, including centers operated by the office; 9 (ii) consider clinical best practices for PPE as it relates to current 10 or state projected public health considerations that may result in an 11 increased need for PPE; 12 (iii) provide PPE pursuant to this section within thirty days of such 13 state declaration to accommodate an immediate need for increased 14 supplies of PPE; 15 (iv) purchase and distribute PPE to protect direct support profes- 16 sionals, care recipients and group home facility personnel, consistent 17 with guidance from the federal centers for disease control and 18 prevention, for at least sixty days at a daily rate of usage equal to 19 the average daily rate that PPE was used between April nineteenth, two 20 thousand twenty and April twenty-seventh, two thousand twenty; and 21 (v) replace and replenish PPE as needed to prevent extended use which 22 would result in damaged PPE. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01005-01-5 A. 4839 2 1 (2) For purposes of this subdivision, "damaged PPE" shall mean: 2 (i) a mask that has become soiled or difficult to breathe through as a 3 result of overuse; 4 (ii) a gown that has become visibly soiled; or 5 (iii) eye protection such as goggles or face shields that have become 6 visibly soiled. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.